Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0006.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


Sec. 1. As used in this act:
(a) "Department" means the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.labor and economic opportunity.
(b) "Employ" means to engage or permit to work.
(c) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer.
Employee does not include an independent contractor.
(d) "Employer" means an individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, association, or corporation, public or private; this
state or an agency of this state; a city, county, village,
township, school district, or intermediate school district; an
institution of higher education; or an individual acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer who that employs 1 or
more individuals. Except as specifically provided in the franchise
agreement, as between a franchisee and franchisor, the franchisee
is considered the sole employer of workers for whom the franchisee
provides a benefit plan or pays wages.
(e) "Fringe benefits" means compensation due an employee
pursuant to a written contract or written policy for holiday, time
off for holidays, time off for sickness or injury, time off for
personal reasons or vacation, bonuses, authorized expenses incurred
during the course of employment, and contributions made on behalf
of an employee.
(f) "Independent contractor" means an individual determined to
be an independent contractor under section 13c(2).
(g) "Payer" means a person that pays remuneration to an
independent contractor for work the independent contractor performs
for the payer.
(h) (f) "Wages" means all earnings of an employee whether
determined on the basis of time, task, piece, commission, or other
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


method of calculation for labor or services. except those defined
as Wages does not include fringe benefits. under subdivision (e)
above.
Sec. 7. (1) Except for those deductions required or expressly
permitted by law or by a collective bargaining agreement, an
employer shall not deduct from the wages of an employee, directly
or indirectly, any amount including an employee contribution to a
separate segregated fund established by a corporation or labor
organization under section 55 of the Michigan campaign finance act,
1976 PA 388, MCL 169.255, without the full, free, and written
consent of the employee, obtained without intimidation or fear of
discharge for refusal to permit the deduction.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (4)
and (5), a deduction for the benefit of the employer requires
written consent from the employee for each wage payment subject to
the deduction, and the cumulative amount of the deductions must not
reduce the gross wages paid to a rate less than the minimum rate as
prescribed in the improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2018 PA
337, MCL 408.931 to 408.945. A nonprofit organization shall obtain
a written consent from an employee for deductions to that nonprofit
organization that qualify as charitable contributions under federal
law. However, this subsection does not require the nonprofit
organization to obtain from an employee a separate written consent
for each subsequent paycheck from which deductions that qualify as
charitable contributions that benefit the employer are made. An
employee at any time may rescind in writing his or her the
employee's authorization to have charitable contributions deducted
from his or her the employee's paycheck. As used in this
subsection, "nonprofit organization" means an organization that is
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501(c)(3).501.
(3) Each deduction from the wages of an employee must be
substantiated in the records of the employer and must be identified
as pertaining to an individual employee. Prorating of deductions
between 2 or more employees is not permitted.
(4) Not later than 6 months after making an overpayment of
wages or fringe benefits that are paid directly to an employee, an
employer may deduct the overpayment from the employee's regularly
scheduled wage payment without the written consent of the employee
if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The overpayment resulted from a mathematical
miscalculation, typographical error, clerical error, or misprint in
the processing of the employee's regularly scheduled wages or
fringe benefits.
(b) The miscalculation, error, or misprint described in
subdivision (a) was made by the employer, the employee, or a
representative of the employer or employee.
(c) The employer provides the employee with a written
explanation of the deduction at least 1 pay period before the wage
payment affected by the deduction is made.
(d) The deduction is not greater than 15% of the gross wages
earned in the pay period in which the deduction is made.
(e) The deduction is made after the employer has made all
deductions expressly permitted or required by law or a collective
bargaining agreement, and after any employee-authorized deduction.
(f) The deduction does not reduce the regularly scheduled
gross wages otherwise due the employee to a rate that is less than
the greater of either of the following:
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


(i) The minimum rate as prescribed by subsection (2).
(ii) The minimum rate as prescribed by the fair labor standards
act of 1938, 29 USC 201 to 219.
(5) If an employer pays any amount of the employee's debt
under a default judgment entered under section 4012(9) or (10) of
the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4012, the
employer may deduct that amount from the employee's regularly
scheduled wage payment without the written consent of the employee
if all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The employer provides the employee with a written
explanation of the deduction at least 1 pay period or 10 business
days, whichever is greater, before the wage payment affected by the
deduction is made.
(b) The deduction is not greater than 15% of the gross wages
earned in the pay period in which the deduction is made.
(c) The deduction is made after the employer has made all
deductions expressly permitted or required by law or a collective
bargaining agreement, and after any employee-authorized deduction.
(d) The deduction does not reduce the regularly scheduled
gross wages otherwise due the employee to a rate that is less than
the greater of either of the following:
(i) The minimum rate as prescribed by subsection (2).
(ii) The minimum rate as prescribed by the fair labor standards
act of 1938, 29 USC 201 to 219.
(6) An employee who believes his or her the employee's
employer has violated subsection (4) or (5) may file a complaint
with the department not later than 12 months after the date of the
alleged violation.
(7) As used in this section, "employer" means an individual,
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


sole proprietorship, partnership, association, or corporation,
public or private, this state or an agency of this state, a city,
county, village, township, school district, or intermediate school
district, an institution of higher education, or an individual
acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer who
that employs 1 or more individuals.
Sec. 11. (1) An employee who believes that his or her the
employee's employer has violated this act may file a written
complaint with the department within not later than 12 months after
the alleged violation. A complaint filed under section 13(2) shall
must be filed within not later than 30 days after the alleged
violation. occurs. Bilingual The department shall provide bilingual
complaint forms shall be provided by the department in those areas
where substantial numbers of non-English speaking non-English-
speaking employees are employed.
(2) Within Not later than a reasonable amount of time after a
complaint is filed, the department shall notify the employer and
investigate the claim, and shall attempt to may informally resolve
the dispute.
(3) If the department is unable to informally resolve the
dispute, the department shall notify the employer and employee
within not later than 90 days after the complaint is filed. The
notification shall must include a determination of the merits of
the complaint and shall cite the specific violation, if any, wages
and fringe benefits due, and specific penalties assessed.
(4) The employer or employee may request a review of the
department's determination within not later than 14 days after the
department issues notification is issued. of its determination. If
the department does not receive a request for a review by either
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


the employer or employee is not received by the department within
14 days, that 14-day period, in the absence of a showing of good
cause for a late request, the department's determination is final.
(5) For the purpose of an investigation or proceeding under
this act, the director of labor the department or an authorized
representative of the director director's designee may administer
oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses , and compel their
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of records or
other documents which that the department considers relevant or
material to the inquiry.
(6) The employee, the employer, and the department shall must
be parties to a proceeding before a hearings officer brought
pursuant to under this section.
(7) The director shall appoint hearings officers to make
determinations in proceedings brought pursuant to under this
section. All proceedings in a hearing shall must be conducted
pursuant to the procedures applicable to the trial of as contested
cases under Act No. 306 of the Public Acts of 1969, as amended,
being sections 24.201 to 24.315 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328. The hearings officer shall affirm, modify, or rescind the
order of the department and may assess costs as provided in section
18(3).
(8) The hearings officer shall issue a determination, which
constitutes is a final disposition of the proceedings, to each
party within not later than 30 days after the conclusion of the
hearing. The determination of the hearings officer shall become
becomes the final agency department order upon receipt by the
parties.
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


(9) A party to the proceeding may obtain judicial review of
the determination of the hearings officer pursuant to Act No. 306
of the Public Acts of 1969, as amended. officer's determination in
accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA
306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Venue for an appeal under this act shall
is proper only be in the circuit where the employee is a resident,
where the employment occurred, or where the employer has a
principal place of business.
(10) If requested by an employee who files a complaint against
an employer under this section, the department shall, to the extent
allowed by law, not disclose to the employer the identity of the
employee.
Sec. 13. (1) An employer shall not discharge, an employee
retaliate against, or otherwise discriminate against an employee
because the employee filed a complaint, instituted or caused to be
instituted a proceeding under or regulated by this act, or
testified or is about to testify in a proceeding , or because of
the exercise by the employee on behalf of an employee or others of
a right afforded by this act.
(2) An employee who believes that he or she the employee is
discharged, or retaliated against, or otherwise discriminated
against by an employer in violation of this section may file a
complaint with the department alleging the discharge, retaliation,
or discrimination within not later than 30 days after the
violation. occurs. Upon receipt of the complaint, the department
shall cause an investigation to be made. If, upon completing the
investigation, the department determines that this section was
violated, the department shall order the rehiring or reinstatement
of an employee to his or her the employee's former position with
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


back pay.
(3) An employer may seek review of the department's
determination by following the procedure provided in section 11(4)
to (9).
Sec. 13a. (1) An employer shall not do any of the following:
(a) Require as a condition of employment nondisclosure by an
employee of his or her the employee's wages.
(b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document
which purports to deny an employee the right to disclose his or her
the employee's wages.
(c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate
against for job advancement an employee who discloses his or her
the employee's wages.
(d) Not later than 30 days after an employee's request, fail
to provide the employee with wage information for similarly
situated employees covering a period of not more than 3 years
before the date of the request. The employer may redact the names
of similarly situated employees, but shall provide information
about the sex and seniority of similarly situated employees for
whom wage information is provided. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Similarly situated employees" means employees who are
within the same job classification as the employee requesting the
information or whose duties are comparable in skill, effort,
responsibility, working conditions, and training to those of the
requesting employee.
(ii) "Wage information" includes salary and hourly wage
information as well as information about bonus pay, overtime pay,
and other forms of compensation provided by the employer.
Sec. 13c. (1) A person shall not classify, report, or treat an
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


employee as an independent contractor. A person that is alleged to
have violated this section has the burden of proving, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the person did not classify,
report, or treat the employee as an independent contractor.
(2) Whether an individual is an independent contractor is
determined as follows:
(a) If the individual works in an industry assigned a North
American Industry Classification System code within sector 23, all
of the following apply to the individual:
(i) The individual performs work for a payer for remuneration.
(ii) The individual is free from control and direction of the
payer in connection with the performance of the work, both under a
contract and in fact.
(iii) The individual performs work that is outside the usual
course of the payer's business.
(iv) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, or business of the same work
performed by the individual for the payer.
(b) If the individual works in an industry other than the
industry described in subdivision (a), by using the economic
realties test under 29 CFR 795.110, as it exists on May 6, 2025,
incorporated as follows:
"§ 795.110 Economic reality test to determine economic
dependence.
(a) Economic reality test.
(1) In order to determine economic dependence, multiple
factors assessing the economic realities of the working
relationship are used. These factors are tools or guides to conduct
a totality-of-the-circumstances analysis. This means that the
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


outcome of the analysis does not depend on isolated factors but
rather upon the circumstances of the whole activity to answer the
question of whether the worker is economically dependent on the
potential employer for work or is in business for themself.
(2) The six factors described in paragraphs (b)(1) through (6)
of this section should guide an assessment of the economic
realities of the working relationship and the question of economic
dependence. Consistent with a totality-of-the-circumstances
analysis, no one factor or subset of factors is necessarily
dispositive, and the weight to give each factor may depend on the
facts and circumstances of the particular relationship. Moreover,
these six factors are not exhaustive. As explained in paragraph
(b)(7) of this section, additional factors may be considered.
(b) Economic reality factors —
(1) Opportunity for profit or loss depending on managerial
skill. This factor considers whether the worker has opportunities
for profit or loss based on managerial skill (including initiative
or business acumen or judgment) that affect the worker's economic
success or failure in performing the work. The following facts,
among others, can be relevant: whether the worker determines or can
meaningfully negotiate the charge or pay for the work provided;
whether the worker accepts or declines jobs or chooses the order
and/or time in which the jobs are performed; whether the worker
engages in marketing, advertising, or other efforts to expand their
business or secure more work; and whether the worker makes
decisions to hire others, purchase materials and equipment, and/or
rent space. If a worker has no opportunity for a profit or loss,
then this factor suggests that the worker is an employee. Some
decisions by a worker that can affect the amount of pay that a
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


worker receives, such as the decision to work more hours or take
more jobs when paid a fixed rate per hour or per job, generally do
not reflect the exercise of managerial skill indicating independent
contractor status under this factor.
(2) Investments by the worker and the potential employer. This
factor considers whether any investments by a worker are capital or
entrepreneurial in nature. Costs to a worker of tools and equipment
to perform a specific job, costs of workers' labor, and costs that
the potential employer imposes unilaterally on the worker, for
example, are not evidence of capital or entrepreneurial investment
and indicate employee status. Investments that are capital or
entrepreneurial in nature and thus indicate independent contractor
status generally support an independent business and serve a
business-like function, such as increasing the worker's ability to
do different types of or more work, reducing costs, or extending
market reach. Additionally, the worker's investments should be
considered on a relative basis with the potential employer's
investments in its overall business. The worker's investments need
not be equal to the potential employer's investments and should not
be compared only in terms of the dollar values of investments or
the sizes of the worker and the potential employer. Instead, the
focus should be on comparing the investments to determine whether
the worker is making similar types of investments as the potential
employer (even if on a smaller scale) to suggest that the worker is
operating independently, which would indicate independent
contractor status.
(3) Degree of permanence of the work relationship. This factor
weighs in favor of the worker being an employee when the work
relationship is indefinite in duration, continuous, or exclusive of
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


work for other employers. This factor weighs in favor of the worker
being an independent contractor when the work relationship is
definite in duration, non-exclusive, project-based, or sporadic
based on the worker being in business for themself and marketing
their services or labor to multiple entities. This may include
regularly occurring fixed periods of work, although the seasonal or
temporary nature of work by itself would not necessarily indicate
independent contractor classification. Where a lack of permanence
is due to operational characteristics that are unique or intrinsic
to particular businesses or industries and the workers they employ,
this factor is not necessarily indicative of independent contractor
status unless the worker is exercising their own independent
business initiative.
(4) Nature and degree of control. This factor considers the
potential employer's control, including reserved control, over the
performance of the work and the economic aspects of the working
relationship. Facts relevant to the potential employer's control
over the worker include whether the potential employer sets the
worker's schedule, supervises the performance of the work, or
explicitly limits the worker's ability to work for others.
Additionally, facts relevant to the potential employer's control
over the worker include whether the potential employer uses
technological means to supervise the performance of the work (such
as by means of a device or electronically), reserves the right to
supervise or discipline workers, or places demands or restrictions
on workers that do not allow them to work for others or work when
they choose. Whether the potential employer controls economic
aspects of the working relationship should also be considered,
including control over prices or rates for services and the
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


marketing of the services or products provided by the worker.
Actions taken by the potential employer for the sole purpose of
complying with a specific, applicable Federal, State, Tribal, or
local law or regulation are not indicative of control. Actions
taken by the potential employer that go beyond compliance with a
specific, applicable Federal, State, Tribal, or local law or
regulation and instead serve the potential employer's own
compliance methods, safety, quality control, or contractual or
customer service standards may be indicative of control. More
indicia of control by the potential employer favors employee
status; more indicia of control by the worker favors independent
contractor status.
(5) Extent to which the work performed is an integral part of
the potential employer's business. This factor considers whether
the work performed is an integral part of the potential employer's
business. This factor does not depend on whether any individual
worker in particular is an integral part of the business, but
rather whether the function they perform is an integral part of the
business. This factor weighs in favor of the worker being an
employee when the work they perform is critical, necessary, or
central to the potential employer's principal business. This factor
weighs in favor of the worker being an independent contractor when
the work they perform is not critical, necessary, or central to the
potential employer's principal business.
(6) Skill and initiative. This factor considers whether the
worker uses specialized skills to perform the work and whether
those skills contribute to business-like initiative. This factor
indicates employee status where the worker does not use specialized
skills in performing the work or where the worker is dependent on
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


training from the potential employer to perform the work. Where the
worker brings specialized skills to the work relationship, this
fact is not itself indicative of independent contractor status
because both employees and independent contractors may be skilled
workers. It is the worker's use of those specialized skills in
connection with business-like initiative that indicates that the
worker is an independent contractor.
(7) Additional factors. Additional factors may be relevant in
determining whether the worker is an employee or independent
contractor for purposes of the FLSA, if the factors in some way
indicate whether the worker is in business for themself, as opposed
to being economically dependent on the potential employer for
work."
(3) A person that, with the intent to defraud, violates this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more
than $1,000.00, or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.
Sec. 13d. (1) The wages and fringe benefits fund is created in
the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from any source into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of the money in the fund and credit interest
and earnings from the investments to the fund.
(3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must
remain in the fund and not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(5) The department shall expend money from the fund, upon
appropriation, only to enforce this act.
Sec. 14. (1) An Except as provided in subsection (2), an
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


employer who that violates this act , including failure to pay the
wages and fringe benefits due an employee as provided in this act,
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) An employer that violates section 13a a second or
subsequent time is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment
for not more than 2 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or
both, for each violation.
Sec. 15. An employer who, that, with the intent to defraud,
fails to make payment of does not pay the wages and fringe benefits
due an employee as provided in this act , is guilty of a
misdemeanor, crime punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00,
or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the
wages and fringe benefits have a value of less than $200.00, the
employer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times
the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater,
or both imprisonment and a fine. If the employer has 1 or more
prior convictions under this section, the employer is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a
fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages
and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and
a fine.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the
wages and fringe benefits have a value of $200.00 or more but less
than $1,000.00, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than
$2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits,
whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. If the
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


employer has 1 or more prior convictions under this section, the
employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 5 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times
the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater,
or both imprisonment and a fine.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the
wages and fringe benefits have a value of $1,000.00 or more but
less than $20,000.00, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, a fine of not more than
$10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits,
whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. If the
employer has 2 or more prior convictions under this section, the
employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than 10 years, a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times
the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater,
or both imprisonment and a fine.
(d) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of
$20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00, the employer is guilty
of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years,
a fine of not more than 3 times the value of the wages and fringe
benefits, or both imprisonment and a fine.
(e) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of
$50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00, the employer is
guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15
years, a fine of not more than 3 times the value of the wages and
fringe benefits, or both imprisonment and a fine.
(f) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of
$100,000.00 or more, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not more than 20 years, a fine of not more than
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, or both
imprisonment and a fine.
Sec. 18. (1) The department shall order an employer who that
violates section 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, or 8, or 13c to pay the
following:
(a) Wages due to the employee.
(b) Fringe benefits due to or on the behalf of the employee in
accordance with the terms set forth in the written contract or
written policy.
(c) A penalty at the rate of 10% 100% annually on the wages
and fringe benefits due the employee, beginning at the time the
employer is notified that a complaint has been filed and ending
when payment is made.
(2) The department may order an employer who that violates
section 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, or 8, or 13c to pay to the employee
exemplary damages of not more than twice 3 times the amount of the
wages and fringe benefits which that were due the employee, if the
violation is flagrant or repeated.
(3) The department may order an employer who that violates
section 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, or 8, or 13c to pay attorney costs,
hearing costs, and transcript costs.
(4) The department may assess a civil penalty fine of not more
than $1,000.00 $10,000.00 against an employer who that violates
this act. , which The civil penalty shall fine must be credited to
the general fund of this state.
(5) All of the following apply to an employer's violation of
section 13c:
(a) If the department collects a penalty or damages from an
employer for violating section 13c, the department shall, unless
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o


otherwise prohibited by law, pay to the affected employee 50% of
the money collected.
(b) The department shall order an employer that violates
section 13c to pay a penalty in an amount equal to the estimated
federal taxes and Medicare payments, if any, that would have been
due the employee if the employer had not violated section 13c.
Subject to subdivision (a) and unless otherwise prohibited by law,
money collected under this subdivision must be deposited into the
wages and fringe benefits fund created in section 13d.
(c) The department shall notify the department of treasury and
the unemployment insurance agency of the violation.
Sec. 19. The director of labor the department shall, and the
attorney general may, initiate, in the county where the violation
occurred, in the county of Ingham County, or in the county where
the employer has its principal office, the civil action necessary
to enforce an order of the department which that has become a final
agency order as prescribed in this act.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
GSS S01104'25 (S-1) imgp1o